Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-885.48
Terms, how construed.

Except for purposes of section 81-885.04,
the terms employ, employed, employer, or employee as used in the
Nebraska Real Estate License Act shall not necessarily be construed
to imply an employer and employee relationship. The use of such terms shall
not prohibit the establishment of any independent contract or other relationship
between a business and an individual, between individuals, or between businesses,
including an employer and employee relationship.

Laws 1978, LB 361, § 13;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 14.